Connecticut, session 2026, HB05029.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That Medicaid provider rates be increased in accordance with phase
one of a Medicaid rate study required pursuant to section 1 of public act
23-186 to (1) ensure such rates are competitive with provider rates
offered in neighboring states, and (2) improve access to quality health
care.